Hawaii statutes.
PART V.
WILD BIRDS AND OTHER WILDLIFE

§183D-61 Permits to take wild birds, game
birds, and game mammals. (a) Notwithstanding the provisions contained in
this chapter, the department may adopt rules pursuant to chapter 91:

(1) Authorizing the taking and collecting of wild
birds, game birds, and game mammals for scientific and educational purposes, or
for the purpose of distributing wild birds to different localities in the State
pursuant to this title;

(2) Authorizing the keeping of wild birds in captivity
for the protection, treatment for injury or disease, propagation, and other
similar purposes consistent with the preservation, protection, and conservation
of wild birds;

(3) Authorizing the taking and destruction of those
wild birds, game birds, and game mammals the department may have found after
investigation to be destructive to crops or to other game birds and game
mammals or otherwise harmful to agriculture or aquaculture, or to constitute a
nuisance or a health hazard; or

(4) Authorizing without requiring permits or reports,
the destruction within a district of wild birds, game birds, and game mammals
which are generally destructive to crops or otherwise harmful to agriculture or
aquaculture, or constitute a nuisance or a health hazard within the district.

(b) Except as provided in subsection (a)(4),
the rules shall require the person or persons seeking authority to apply for
and obtain a written permit from the department. The permits may prescribe
terms and conditions the department deems necessary to prevent abuse of the
authority granted thereby, and may be canceled by the department, after notice
and hearing, for the violation of any term or condition. [L 1985, c 174, pt of
§4; am L 1986, c 272, §2; am L 1987, c 156, §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next